Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1969.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7911 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7911. Motorcycle safety education program.* * *(c) Refundable registration fee.--(1) A fee may not be charged to an individual who registers for an approved motorcycle safety course except for a nominal registration fee as determined by the department, which shall not exceed $50 and shall be refunded if the individual attends the approved motorcycle safety course. Any nominal registration fee not refunded under this subsection shall be deposited into the Motorcycle Safety Education Account established under section 7905 (relating to 123456789101112131415161718 restricted receipts account).(2) Within 18 months of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall issue a report analyzing the effect of the fee authorized under this subsection on enrollment in motorcycle safety courses. The department shall issue the report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives and post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall include all of the following:(i) Data regarding the number of individuals who completed a motorcycle safety course prior to the effective date of this subsection.(ii) Data regarding the number of individuals who enrolled in a motorcycle safety course prior to the effective date of this subsection and failed to attend the motorcycle safety course.(iii) Data regarding the number of individuals who completed a motorcycle safety course after the effective date of this subsection.(iv) Data regarding the number of individuals who enrolled in a motorcycle safety course after the effective date of this subsection and failed to attend the motorcycle safety course.(v) The total amount of fees refunded under this subsection.(vi) The total amount of fees deposited into the Motorcycle Safety Education Account under this subsection.20250HB1969PN2484 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Suggested statutory changes that may improve enrollment in motorcycle safety courses.(viii) Any other information at the discretion of the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1969PN2484 - 3 - 12345